ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente din alamă > Îngrijirea și curățarea instrumentelor din alamă > Dispozitive de protecție pentru instrumente din alamă: Dispozitive de protecție pentru clopote; Dispozitive de protecție pentru taste; Dispozitive de protecție pentru elemente mobile; Dispozitive de protecție pentru valve
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de sopro de metal > Manutenção e limpeza de instrumentos de sopro de metal > Protetores para instrumentos de sopro de metal: Protetores de sino; Protetores de botão de dedo; Protetores da vara; Protetores de válvula
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre dychové nástroje > Starostlivosť a čistenie dychových nástrojov > Chrániče dychových nástrojov: Chrániče zvonov; Chrániče prstových tlačidiel; Chrániče diapozitívov; Chrániče ventilov
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων > Φροντίδα & καθαρισμός χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων > Προστατευτικά χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων: Προστατευτικά καμπάνας; Προστατευτικά κουμπιών δακτύλων; Προστατευτικά σλάιντ; Προστατευτικά βαλβίδων
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за духови инструменти > Грижа и почистване на духови инструменти > Предпазители за духови инструменти: Предпазители за финия; Протектори за копчета; Предпазители за плъзгащи тръби; Предпазители за клапани
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 銅管樂器配件 > 銅管樂器清潔保養品 > 銅管樂器握把: 號嘴護套; 按鍵護套; 滑音管護套; 活塞護套
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de instrumentos de sopro > Limpeza e cuidado de instrumentos de sopro > Proteções de instrumentos de sopro: Proteções de campana; Proteções de botões; Proteções de braço de vara; Proteções de válvula
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per ottoni > Cura e pulitura ottoni > Protezioni ottoni: Protezioni campane; Protezioni per dita; Protezioni scorrevoli; Protezioni per valvole
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till bleckblåsinstrument > Vård och rengöring av bleckblåsinstrument > Skydd för bleckblåsinstrument: Klockskydd; Fingerknappsskydd; Skjutskydd; Ventilskydd
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Messingblæser – tilbehør > Messingblæser – pleje og rengøring > Messingblæser – beskyttelse: Klokkebeskyttere; Fingerknapbeskyttere; Slidebeskyttere; Ventilbeskyttere
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour cuivres > Entretien et nettoyage des cuivres > Protections pour cuivres: Protections de cloche; Protections pour boutons; Protections pour coulisses; Protections pour valves
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Rézfúvóshangszer-kiegészítő > Rézfúvóshangszer-ápolás és -tisztítás > Rézfúvóshangszer-védők: Harangőrök; Ujjgombvédők; Diavédők; Szelepvédők
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 金管楽器用品 > 金管楽器お手入れ用品 > 金管楽器用プロテクター: ベルガード; フィンガーボタンガード; スライドガード; バルブガード
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za limena puhaća glazbala > Održavanje i čišćenje limenih puhaćih glazbala > Zaštita za limena puhaća glazbala: Štitnik ljevkastog završetka; Štitnici za gumbe za prste; Štitnici za produžne cijevi; Štitnici ventila
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง > การดูแลและทำความสะอาดเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง > ที่รองจับของเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง: เบลล์การ์ด; ที่ป้องกันปุ่มนิ้ว; ที่ป้องกันสไลด์; ที่ป้องกันวาล์ว
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor koperen blaasinstrumenten > Onderhoud en reiniging van koperen blaasinstrumenten > Beschermers voor koperen blaasinstrumenten: Beschermers voor bekers; Beschermers voor vingerknoppen; Beschermers voor schuiftrompetten; Beschermers voor ventielen
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priedai > Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priežiūra ir valymas > Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų apsaugos: Varpų apsaugos; Mygtukų apsaugos; Slankiklių apsaugos; Vožtuvų apsaugos
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для медных духовых инструментов > Чистка медных духовых инструментов и уход за ними > Защитные накладки для медных духовых инструментов: Защитные накладки для раструбов; Защитные накладки для клапанов; Защитные накладки для кулис; Защитные накладки для вентилей
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện kèn đồng > Sản phẩm vệ sinh và chăm sóc kèn đồng > Dụng cụ chắn cho nhạc cụ đồng: Bọc miệng kèn; Dụng cụ chắn nút bấm; Dụng cụ chắn thanh trượt; Dụng cụ chắn van
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Žesťové nástroje – příslušenství > Údržba a čištění žesťových nástrojů > Chrániče na žesťové nástroje: Chrániče zvonu; Chrániče klapek; Chrániče tahů; Chrániče ventilů
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de metal > Limpieza y cuidado de instrumentos de metal > Protectores para instrumentos de metal: Protectores de campana; Protectores de pulsadores; Protectores de varas; Protectores de válvulas
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za trobila > Nega in čiščenje trobil > Zaščitni pokrovi za trobila: Zaščitni pokrovi za zvonce; Ščitniki za prstne gumbe; Ščitniki za drsnike; Ščitniki za ventile
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Vaskipuhallintarvikkeet > Vaskipuhaltimien hoito ja puhdistus > Vaskipuhaltimien venttiilisuojat: Peitesuojat; Sormipainikkeiden suojat; Luistisuojat; Venttiilien suojat
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Bakım ve Temizliği > Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Muhafazaları: Zil Muhafızları; Parmak Düğmesi Korumaları; Slayt Korumaları; Valf Korumaları
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 금관악기 부대용품 > 금관악기 관리/청소 용품 > 금관악기 가드: 벨 가드; 손가락 버튼 가드; 슬라이드 가드; 밸브 가드
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów dętych blaszanych > Elementy konserwujące i czyszczące do instrumentów dętych blaszanych > Osłony do instrumentów dętych blaszanych: Osłony czary głosowej; Osłony przycisków; Osłony suwaka; Osłony zaworów
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til messinginstrumenter > Pleie og rengjøring av messinginstrumenter > Beskyttelse for messinginstrumenter: Klokkevakter; Fingerknappbeskyttelse; Slidebeskyttere; Ventilbeskyttere
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 铜管乐器配件 > 铜管乐器清洁保养 > 铜管乐器护具: 喇叭护罩; 指扣护罩; 伸缩管护罩; 活塞护罩
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Blechblasinstrumente > Blechblasinstrumentenpflege &-reinigung > Schutzvorrichtungen für Blechblasinstrumente: Trichterhülle; Fingerauflage; Zugbogenabdeckung; Ventilabdeckung
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Brass Instrument Accessories > Brass Instrument Care & Cleaning > Brass Instrument Guards: Bell Guards; Finger Button Guards; Slide Guards; Valve Guards